Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1213
Notarial protest as evidence of dishonor; bill of exchange or promissory note.

The usual protest by a notary public, without proof of his signature or notarial seal, is evidence of the dishonor and notice of a bill of exchange or promissory note.

R.S.1867, Code § 349, p. 452;

R.S.1913, § 7905;

C.S.1922, § 8847;

C.S.1929, § 20-1213;

R.S.1943, § 25-1213.

Certificate of notary is evidence of notice as well as protest. Williams v. Parks, 63 Neb. 747, 89 N.W. 395 (1902).